Hawaii statutes.
SUBTITLE 3.
MINING AND MINERALS

CHAPTER
181

STRIP
MINING

Section

181-1 Definitions

181-2 Powers of board

181-3 Prohibitions

181-4 Application for permit; fee

181-5 Bond

181-6 Reclamation

181-7 Termination, revocation of permit; release

181-8 Appeal

181-9 Penalty; injunction

181-10 Funds

Cross References

Environmental courts,
jurisdiction over proceedings arising under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next